District of Columbia statutes.
29-412.09

Directors’ duties.

(a)

Directors shall cause the dissolved nonprofit corporation to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment of claims and make distributions of assets after payment or provision for claims.

(b)

Directors of a dissolved nonprofit corporation that has disposed of claims under § 29-412.06, § 29-412.07, or § 29-412.08 shall not be liable for breach of § 29-412.09(a) with respect to claims against the dissolved corporation that are barred or satisfied under § 29-412.06, § 29-412.07, or § 29-412.08.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720